Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201821-530
Merger authorized; parties restricted.

A series limited liability company may be party to a merger in accordance with sections 21-171 to 21-174, this section, and sections 21-531 to 21-534 only if:

(1) each other party to the merger is a limited liability company; and

(2) the surviving company is not created in the merger.

Laws 2018, LB1121, § 31.
January 1, 2021